src-fst-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
LEXICON TSÅHPÅK  ! hardcoded denominal derivations latus has changed from o>u, a>a, e>á AND -GIS attr. Attr same as pred is err/orth taged. no comp in this lexicon. 

LEXICON GIEVLEK  ! hardcoded derivations, not same as BÁJNUK since latus has unexpected vowel. Latus hasn't changed o>u, a>a, e>á. Goes directly to BÁJNUK, only made to sort these different kinds of derivations. Many of these may be derivated from verbs or other adjectives.

LEXICON SJERVAK  ! hardcoded derivations, not same as TSÅHPÅK since latus has unexpected vowel. Latus hasn't changed o>u, a>a, e>á. Goes directly to TSÅHPÅK, only made to sort these different kinds of derivations. Many of these may be derivated from verbs or other adjectives.

LEXICON DIBME  ! even and contracted

LEXICON LIS  ! Handlernomen på -is?

LEXICON Ahkásasj  ! lexicalized and denominal -asj derivations

LEXICON STÁVVALIS  ! Must be "stávvalis" in bot pred and attr, as "guovddelis". OK& Kintel 2012: stávval attr stávvalis this is err/orth taged, also as second compound, this is err/orth taged. No comparison.

Derivations to adjectives, continuation lexicon not for hardcoded adjectives

LEXICON AHTES  ! odd syllable, only a continuation lexicon for words that are not in adjectives stems. Just as DIEHTEMAHTES, only with the +A tag that adjectives already get i stems file.

LEXICON AHKES   

LEXICON AGAdj  ! denominal derivations go here, attr same as pred, no comp in this lexicon

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smj/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
